Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-377
Proceedings by Attorney General or county attorney; enforcement of revenue laws.

The Department of Revenue may request the Attorney General or any county attorney to institute proceedings, actions, and prosecutions as may be required to enforce the laws relating to penalties, liabilities, assessments, collection, and payment of revenue and punishment of public officers, persons, or officers or agents of corporations for failure to comply with or for neglect to comply with the provisions of any revenue or property tax law administered by or subject to the administrative jurisdiction of the department.

Laws 1965, c. 459, § 8, p. 1457;

R.S.1943, (1976), § 77-327;

Laws 1980, LB 834, § 18;

Laws 1993, LB 345, § 7;

Laws 2007, LB334, § 27.